Wisconsin, session 2025, AB454.
do enact as follows:AB454,11Section 1. 234.66 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB454,3,62234.66 (2) (a) (intro.) There is established under the jurisdiction and control 1of the authority a residential housing infrastructure revolving loan fund, for the 2purpose of providing loans under sub. (3) and for deposit in the workforce home loan 3fund under s. 234.665 (2) (a). The authority may use moneys in the fund to cover 4actual and necessary expenses incurred to accomplish the purposes of this section, 5including marketing expenses under sub. (6), and administer the fund. The fund 6shall consist of all of the following:AB454,27Section 2. 234.661 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB454,3,148234.661 (2) (a) (intro.) There is established under the jurisdiction and control 9of the authority a main street housing rehabilitation revolving loan fund, for the 10purpose of providing loans under sub. (3) and for deposit in the workforce home loan 11fund under s. 234.665 (2) (a). The authority may use moneys in the fund to cover 12actual and necessary expenses, including marketing expenses under sub. (4), 13incurred to accomplish the purposes of this section and administer the fund. The 14fund shall consist of all of the following:AB454,315Section 3. 234.662 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB454,3,2216234.662 (2) (a) (intro.) There is established under the jurisdiction and control 17of the authority a commercial-to-housing conversion revolving loan fund, for the 18purpose of providing loans under sub. (3) and for deposit in the workforce home loan 19fund under s. 234.665 (2) (a). The authority may use moneys in the fund to cover 20actual and necessary expenses incurred to accomplish the purposes of this section, 21including marketing expenses under sub. (4), and administer the fund. The fund 22shall consist of all of the following:AB454,423Section 4. 234.665 of the statutes is created to read:AB454,4,21234.665 Workforce home loan revolving loan program. (1) 2Definitions. In this section:AB454,4,43(a) “Applicant” means each person who is a member of a household and who is 4applying for a workforce home loan on behalf of that household.AB454,4,75(b) “Area median income” means the area median family income in the county 6in which the residence is located, not adjusted for family size, as determined by the 7federal housing finance agency.AB454,4,138(c) “Household compliance income” means the anticipated combined income, 9as determined by the authority according to its underwriting guidelines, of all 10individuals age 18 or older who intend to occupy the residence subject to a 11workforce home loan, regardless of whether the individual is the applicant for the 12workforce home loan and regardless of the individual’s relationship to the applicant 13for the workforce home loan.AB454,4,1714(d) “Qualified organization” means an authorized lender, as defined in s. 15234.59 (1) (a), or a housing authority, as defined in s. 16.301 (2) (a), a community-16based organization, as defined in s. 16.301 (1), or another qualified local 17organization, as determined by the authority.AB454,4,2118(e) “Qualifying income” means the sum of the income of all eligible applicants 19in the household for purposes of assessing the combined ability of all applicants in 20the household to repay the workforce home loan, as determined by the authority 21according to its underwriting guidelines.AB454,4,2222(f) “Substantial rehabilitation” means any of the following:AB454,5,2231. The repair, restoration, construction, improvement, or remodeling of a 1building for which the cost exceeds 35 percent of the building’s value for purposes of 2taxation under ch. 70 for the year preceding the year in which the work was begun.AB454,5,332. A change in zoning classification from nonresidential to residential.AB454,5,54(g) “Underwriting guidelines” means the authority’s conventional first-time 5home buyer first mortgage program underwriting guidelines.AB454,5,76(h) “Workforce home loan” means a loan issued by the authority under sub. (5) 7(a).AB454,5,138(2) Establishment of fund. (a) There is established under the jurisdiction 9and control of the authority a workforce home loan fund, for the purpose of 10providing loans under sub. (5). The authority may use moneys in the fund to cover 11actual and necessary expenses incurred to accomplish the purposes of this section, 12including marketing expenses, and administer the fund. The fund shall consist of 13all of the following:AB454,5,14141. All moneys allocated by the authority to the fund.AB454,5,15152. All moneys received from the repayment of loans under sub. (5).AB454,5,1816(b) In its discretion, the authority may invest fund moneys that are not 17required for immediate use or disbursement in all of the following to the extent 18lawful for fiduciaries in this state:AB454,5,21191. An obligation of the United States or one of its agencies or 20instrumentalities, or an obligation the principal and interest of which are 21guaranteed by the United States or one of its agencies or instrumentalities.AB454,5,23222. An obligation of any state, or of any county, city, or other political 23subdivision of a state, having long-term ratings in the AA category or higher. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab454 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab454 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB454 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB454 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB454: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting